South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3484.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 40-7-20(2) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (2) "Hair braiding" means the weaving or interweaving of natural human hair for compensation without cutting, coloring, permanent waving, relaxing, removing, or chemical treatment. Hair braiding also includes the use of hair extensions, except when used in public places including, but not limited to, beaches, parks, and sidewalks. Hair braiding is distinct from the practices of barbering as defined in item (1) and cosmetology as defined in Section 40-13-20. SECTION 2.  Section 40-7-390 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 40-7-390.  These persons are exempt from this chapter while engaged in the proper discharge of their professional duties: (1) persons authorized under the laws of this State to practice medicine and surgery; (2) commissioned medical or surgical officers of the United States Army, Navy, or Marine hospital service; (3) registered nurses; (4) students in schools, colleges, and universities who practice barbering only upon students in the school, college, or university premises for the purpose of earning part of their school expenses; (5) undertakers; (6) persons authorized by state law to practice cosmetology only when they are practicing in salons or schools of cosmetology; (7) persons providing hair braiding but no other services requiring a license under this chapter or Chapter 13; and (8) persons providing make-up artistry but no other services requiring a license under this chapter or Chapter 13. SECTION 3.  Section 40-13-360 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 40-13-360. The following are exempt from this chapter while engaged in the proper discharge of their professional duties: (1) a manufacturer's representative or sales person who demonstrates a product or technique for a promotional purpose; (2) an educational activity conducted in connection with a monthly, annual, or other special program from which the general public is excluded, provided this exemption applies only to the specific days of the special program; (3) a demonstration conducted by a manufacturer or a wholesaler for the purpose of exhibiting the technical application and use of a product; and (4) an unlicensed person employed in a cosmetology salon whose duties are expressly confined to shampooing hair under the direct supervision of a cosmetologist; (5) a person providing hair braiding, as defined in Section 40-7-20, but no other services requiring a license under this chapter or Chapter 7; and (6) a person providing make-up artistry but no other services requiring a license under this chapter or Chapter 7. SECTION 4.  Section 40-7-255 of the S.C. Code is repealed. SECTION 5.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----